Maine, session 132, LD384.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA c. 223, sub-c. 12 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 12
STUDENT HOMELESSNESS PREVENTION
§6691. Student Homelessness Prevention Program
The Student Homelessness Prevention Program, referred to in this section as "the
program," is established within the department in the office of the department responsible
for school and student supports.
1. Purpose. The purpose of the program is to help elementary students and secondary
students avoid homelessness by identifying students and families of students who are at
risk of homelessness and providing direct financial assistance to help them maintain stable
permanent housing.
2. Fund established. The Student Homelessness Prevention Fund is established as a
nonlapsing fund within the department for the purposes of supporting the program. The
fund may receive money from any available state, federal or private source.
3. Program requirements. The department shall provide a local educational agency
liaison for students experiencing homelessness designated pursuant to the federal
McKinney-Vento Homeless Education Assistance Improvements Act of 2001, 42 United
States Code, Section 11431 et seq. The liaison shall:
A. Identify students who are at risk of homelessness but not yet homeless; and
B. In addition to any federal assistance available, provide up to $750 per academic year
to the family or guardian of a student at risk of homelessness for services authorized
under the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Education Assistance Improvements Act
of 2001, in addition to other housing-related needs such as rental assistance, utilities,
critical home repairs and other assistance that will help the student avoid homelessness.
Page 1 - 132LR0291(06)

4. Assistance not income or asset. Financial assistance received under the program
is not income for purposes of the State's income tax laws and is not income or an asset for
the purposes of determining eligibility for or the benefit amount to be paid from any public
assistance program administered by the State or by a municipality pursuant to Title 22,
chapter 1161.
5. Rules. The department may adopt rules to implement the program. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
School and Student Supports Z270
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds to help students avoid homelessness by providing
liaisons designated pursuant to the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Education
Assistance Improvements Act of 2001 access to emergency financial assistance for the
family of a student in an amount of up to $750 per student.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $125,000 $125,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $125,000 $125,000
Page 2 - 132LR0291(06)